Utah statutes.
62A-4a-118.   Annual review of child welfare referrals and cases by
executive director -- Accountability to the Legislature -- Review by
legislative auditor general.
(1)  The division shall use principles of quality management systems,
including statistical measures of processes of service, and the routine
reporting of performance data to employees.
(2) (a)  In addition to development of quantifiable outcome measures and
performance measures in accordance with Section 62A-4a-117, the executive
director, or his designee, shall annually review a randomly selected sample of
child welfare referrals to and cases handled by the division.  The purpose of
that review shall be to assess whether the division is adequately protecting
children and providing appropriate services to families, in accordance with
the provisions of Title 62A, Chapter 4a, Child and Family Services, and Title
78A, Chapter 6, Part 3, Abuse, Neglect, and Dependency Proceedings, and Part
5, Termination of Parental Rights Act.  The review shall focus directly on the
outcome of cases to children and families, and not simply on procedural
compliance with specified criteria.
(b)  The executive director shall report, regarding his review of those cases,
to the legislative auditor general and the Child Welfare Legislative Oversight
Panel.
(c)  Information obtained as a result of the review shall be provided to
caseworkers, supervisors, and division personnel involved in the respective
cases, for purposes of education, training, and performance evaluation.
(3)  The executive director's review and report to the Legislature shall
include:
(a)  the criteria used by the executive director, or his designee, in making
the evaluation;
(b)  findings regarding whether state statutes, division policy, and
legislative policy were followed in each sample case;
(c)  findings regarding whether, in each sample case, referrals, removals, or
cases were appropriately handled by the division and its employees, and
whether children were adequately and appropriately protected and appropriate
services provided to families, in accordance with the provisions of Title 62A,
Chapter 4a, Child and Family Services, Title 78A, Chapter 6, Part 3, Abuse,
Neglect, and Dependency Proceedings, and Part 5, Termination of Parental
Rights Act, and division policy;
(d)  an assessment of the division's intake procedures and decisions,
including an assessment of the appropriateness of decisions not to accept
referrals; and
(e)  an assessment of the appropriateness of the division's assignment of
priority.
(4) (a)  In addition to the review conducted by the executive director,
beginning July 1, 2004, the legislative auditor general shall audit a sample
of child welfare referrals to and cases handled by the division and report his
findings to the Child Welfare Legislative Oversight Panel.
(b)  An audit under Subsection (4)(a) shall be conducted at least once every
three years, but may be conducted more frequently pursuant to Subsection
(4)(d).
(c)  With regard to the sample of referrals, removals, and cases, the
Legislative Auditor General's report may include:
(i)  findings regarding whether state statutes, division policy, and
legislative policy were followed by the division and its employees;
(ii)  a determination regarding whether referrals, removals, and cases were
appropriately handled by the division and its employees, and whether children
were adequately and appropriately protected and appropriate services provided
for families, in accordance with the provisions of Title 62A, Chapter 4a,
Child and Family Services, Title 78A, Chapter 6, Part 3, Abuse, Neglect, and
Dependency Proceedings, and Part 5, Termination of Parental Rights Act, and
division policy;
(iii)  an assessment of the division's intake procedures and decisions,
including an assessment of the appropriateness of decisions not to accept
referrals;
(iv)  an assessment of the appropriateness of the division's assignment of
priority;
(v)  a determination regarding whether the department's review process is
effecting beneficial change within the division and accomplishing the mission
established by the Legislature and the department for that review process; and
(vi)  findings regarding any other issues identified by the auditor or others
under Subsection (4)(d).
(d)  An audit under Subsection (4)(a) may be initiated by:
(i)  the Audit Subcommittee of the Legislative Management Committee;
(ii)  the Child Welfare Legislative Oversight Panel; or
(iii)  the Legislative Auditor General, based on the results of the executive
director's review under Subsection (2).
